Washington statutes.
RCW 10.82.030

Commitment for failure to pay fine and costs—Execution against defendant's property—Reduction by payment, labor, or confinement.

If any person ordered into custody until the fine and costs adjudged against him or her be paid shall not, within five days, pay, or cause the payment of the same to be made, the clerk of the court shall issue a warrant to the sheriff commanding him or her to imprison such defendant in the county jail until the amount of such fine and costs owing are paid. Execution may at any time issue against the property of the defendant for that portion of such fine and costs not reduced by the application of this section. The amount of such fine and costs owing shall be the whole of such fine and costs reduced by the amount of any portion thereof paid, and an amount established by the county legislative authority for every day the defendant performs labor as provided in RCW 10.82.040, and a lesser amount established by the county legislative authority for every day the defendant does not perform such labor while imprisoned.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1064; 1991 c 183 s 1; 1983 c 276 s 2; 1967 c 200 s 4; 1891 c 28 s 84; 1883 p 38 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 1125; 1873 p 243 s 283; 1854 p 124 s 147; RRS s 2206. Formerly RCW 10.82.030 and 10.82.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 c 200: See note following RCW 9.45.122.

Commitment until fines and costs are paid: RCW 10.70.010.

Fine and costs, liability of defendant, collection procedure, contempt, commitment, execution: RCW 10.01.160 through 10.01.180.